Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 44 Community Colleges
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-44-1.
Declaration of intention.

The general assembly, having found that the welfare of the state and the educational interests of many of its young people will be served by college programs of two (2) years’ duration offered by institutions established for this specific purpose, declares its intention to provide those educational programs through the establishment and operation of two (2) year community colleges as a part of a unified system of higher education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 47, § 1.

16-44-2.
Purposes of community colleges.

It shall be the purposes of the community colleges to provide educational programs of two (2) years’ duration as follows:

Two (2) year college transfer programs;

Two (2) year terminal general education programs;

Two (2) year college technical and vocational programs; and

Any other educational programs and services as are appropriate to these institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 47, § 1.

16-44-3.
Pawtuxet Valley Community College.

The board of governors for higher education is authorized and empowered to establish an institution to be known as Pawtuxet Valley Community College, and the board is authorized to enroll students in the college.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 47, § 1.

16-44-4.
Mount Hope Community College.

The board of governors for higher education is authorized and empowered to establish an institution to be known as Mount Hope Community College, and the board is authorized to enroll students in the college.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 47, § 1.

16-44-5.
Blackstone Valley Community College.

The board of governors for higher education is hereby authorized and empowered to establish an institution to be known as Blackstone Valley Community College, and the board is authorized to enroll students in the college.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 47, § 1.

16-44-6.
Management of community colleges.

The board of governors for higher education shall be responsible for the control, management, and operation of community colleges in the same manner as it has been responsible for the control, management, and operation of the University of Rhode Island and of Rhode Island College.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 47, § 1.

16-44-7.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary for the maintenance and support of the community colleges. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of the sum as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 47, § 1.